apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix
<pardef n="atletik/o__n">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ino__n">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ino</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inoj</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inon</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inojn</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="oj__n">
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="web__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nompl__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="BBC__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
<!--  US Highways ^US<n><acr><sp>$ ^Highway<n><pl>$ ^US<adj><pl><nom>$ ^Aŭtovojo<n><pl><nom>$ USaj Aŭtovojoj -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="acr"/></r></p><par n="sgpl"/><par n="nomacc"/></e>

</pardef>

<!-- landonomoj: akceptas -io, -ujo, -lando; generas -io -->
<pardef n="Alban/io__np">
  <e>       <p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ion</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujon</l>      <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>landon</l>    <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ion</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- landonomoj: akceptas -io, -ujo, -lando; generas -ujo -->
<pardef n="Esperant/ujo__np">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>io</l>        <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujo</l>       <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ion</l>       <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ujon</l>      <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>landon</l>    <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ujon</l>      <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>ujo<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- landonomoj: akceptas -io, -ujo, -lando; generas -lando -->
<pardef n="Pol/lando__np">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>io</l>        <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lando</l>     <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ion</l>       <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujon</l>      <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>landon</l>    <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>landon</l>    <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>lando</l>     <r>lando<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="saluton__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Paradigma article -->

<pardef n="la__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="mia__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="dem__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

	 
<pardef n="ind__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="alia">            <i>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="atletiko">        <i>atletik</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="barcelonano">     <i>barcelonan</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="basbalo">         <i>basbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="basketbalo">      <i>basketbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="bonan nokton">    <i>bonan<b/>nokton</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="bonan vesperon">  <i>bonan<b/>vesperon</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="certa">           <i>certa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="CiU">             <i>CiU</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="diversa">         <i>diversa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="emerito">         <i>emerit</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ERC">             <i>ERC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="fa">              <i>fa</i><par n="web__n"/></e>
<e lm="fek">             <i>fek</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="futbalo">         <i>futbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="halfutbalo">         <i>halfutbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="geedzoj">         <i>geedzoj</i><par n="nompl__n"/></e>
<e lm="gefratoj">         <i>gefrat</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gefiloj">         <i>gefil</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gebaptopatroj">         <i>gebaptopatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="geduonpatroj">         <i>geduonpatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="duongepatroj">         <i>duongepatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gebopatroj">         <i>gebopatr</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gefianĉoj">         <i>gefianĉ</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="geamatoj">         <i>geamat</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
<e lm="gesamseksemuloj"> <i>gesamseksemuloj</i><par n="nompl__n"/></e>
<e lm="gvidanto">        <i>gvidant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="handbalo">        <i>handbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="ho Dio">          <i>ho<b/>Dio</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ilia">            <i>ilia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="IMF">             <i>IMF</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="internaĵoj">      <i>internaĵoj</i><par n="nompl__n"/></e>
<e lm="iu">              <i>iu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="kalsonŝtrumpoj">  <i>kalsonŝtrumpoj</i><par n="nompl__n"/></e>
<e lm="kataro">          <i>katar</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="kia embaraso">    <i>kia<b/>embaraso</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kia troigo">      <i>kia<b/>troigo</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="m/s">              <i>m/s</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="la">              <i>la</i><par n="la__det"/></e>
<e lm="la sama">         <i>la<b/>sama</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="lapono">          <i>lapon</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="lia">             <i>lia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="mg">              <i>mg</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="mia">             <i>mia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="najbaro">         <i>najbar</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="neniu">           <i>neniu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="nia">             <i>nia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="nu">              <i>nu</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="p.K.">            <i>p.K.</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="pneŭmologo">      <i>pneŭmolog</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="PSUC">            <i>PSUC</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="samseksemulo">    <i>samseksemul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="tiu">             <i>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
<e lm="tuta">            <i>tuta</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="via">             <i>via</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="volejbalo">       <i>volejbal</i><par n="atletik/o__n"/></e>
<e lm="W">               <i>W</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
<e lm="web">             <i>web</i><par n="web__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĝia">             <i>ĝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĝis baldaŭ">      <i>ĝis<b/>baldaŭ</i><par n="saluton__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ŝia">             <i>ŝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="Baŝkirio">            <i>Baŝkir</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ĉuvaŝio">            <i>Ĉuvaŝ</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tatario">            <i>Tatar</i><par n="Alban/io__np"/></e>
